Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.040

"Registered nursing practice" defined—Exceptions. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) "Registered nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring substantial specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill based on the principles of the biological, physiological, behavioral, and sociological sciences in either:

(a) The observation, assessment, diagnosis, care or counsel, and health teaching of individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities, or in the maintenance of health or prevention of illness of others;

(b) The performance of such additional acts requiring education and training and that are recognized by the medical and nursing professions as proper and recognized by the *commission to be performed by registered nurses licensed under this chapter and that are authorized by the *commission through its rules;

(c) The administration, supervision, delegation, and evaluation of nursing practice. However, nothing in this subsection affects the authority of a hospital, hospital district, in-home service agency, community-based care setting, medical clinic, or office, concerning its administration and supervision;

(d) The teaching of nursing;

(e) The executing of medical regimen as prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician assistant, or advanced registered nurse practitioner, or as directed by a licensed midwife within his or her scope of practice.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.

(3) This section does not prohibit (a) the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be a registered nurse, (b) the practice of licensed practical nursing by a licensed practical nurse, or (c) the practice of a nursing assistant, providing delegated nursing tasks under chapter 18.88A RCW.

[2020 c 80 s 15; 2012 c 13 s 1; 2003 c 140 s 1; 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 50; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 404.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Effective date—2003 c 140: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 7, 2003]." [2003 c 140 s 13.]

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.

PDFRCW 18.79.040

"Registered nursing practice" defined—Exceptions. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) "Registered nursing practice" means the performance of acts requiring substantial specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill based on the principles of the biological, physiological, behavioral, and sociological sciences in either:

(a) The observation, assessment, diagnosis, care or counsel, and health teaching of individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities, or in the maintenance of health or prevention of illness of others;

(b) The performance of such additional acts requiring education and training and that are recognized by the medical and nursing professions as proper and recognized by the board to be performed by registered nurses licensed under this chapter and that are authorized by the board through its rules;

(c) The administration, supervision, delegation, and evaluation of nursing practice. However, nothing in this subsection affects the authority of a hospital, hospital district, in-home service agency, community-based care setting, medical clinic, or office, concerning its administration and supervision;

(d) The teaching of nursing;

(e) The executing of medical regimen as prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, or as directed by a licensed midwife within his or her scope of practice.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from practicing a profession for which a license has been issued under the laws of this state or specifically authorized by any other law of the state of Washington.

(3) This section does not prohibit (a) the nursing care of the sick, without compensation, by an unlicensed person who does not hold himself or herself out to be a registered nurse, (b) the practice of licensed practical nursing by a licensed practical nurse, or (c) the practice of a nursing assistant, providing delegated nursing tasks under chapter 18.88A RCW.

[2024 c 239 s 2; 2020 c 80 s 15; 2012 c 13 s 1; 2003 c 140 s 1; 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 50; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 404.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Effective date—2003 c 140: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 7, 2003]." [2003 c 140 s 13.]

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.